New York, session 2025-2026, A6651.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 137 of the correction law is amending by adding a 2 new subdivision 7 to read as follows: 3 7. The evidentiary standard for all evidentiary and disciplinary hear- 4 ings shall be a preponderance of the evidence. 5 § 2. Subdivision 4 of section 7803 of the civil practice law and rules 6 is amended to read as follows: 7 4. whether a determination made as a result of a hearing held, and at 8 which evidence was taken, pursuant to direction by law is, on the entire 9 record, supported by substantial evidence, or in the case of an eviden- 10 tiary or disciplinary hearing held pursuant to the correction law, a 11 preponderance of the evidence. 12 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 13 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10352-01-5